fr: Type de fermeture du système de maintien du casque: Anneau double D; Fermeture magnétique; Cliquet micrométrique; Boucle à dégagement rapide; Autre
tr: Kask sabitleme kayışı kapatma türü: Çift D halkalı; Manyetik kapatma; Mikrometrik mandal; Çabuk açılan toka; Diğer
pl: Typ zapięcia systemu retencyjnego kasku: Podwójne D; Zapięcie magnetyczne; Zapięcie mikrometryczne; Klamra szybkozamykająca; Inny
it: Fidelizzazione del casco tipo di chiusura dei clienti: Doppio anello a D; Chiusura magnetica; Cricchetto micrometrico; Fibbia a sgancio rapido; Altro
es: Tipo de cierre de retención del casco: Doble anillo en D; Cierre magnético; Trinquete micrométrico; Hebilla de liberación rápida; Otro
nl: Helm retentie sluiting type: Dubbele D-ring; Magnetische sluiting; Micrometrische ratel; Snelsluiting; Overig
fi: Kypärän kiinnittimen tyyppi: Kaksois-D-rengas; Magneettikiinnitys; Mikrometrinen räikkä; Pikalukko; Muu
el: Τύπος κλεισίματος του ιμάντα του κράνους.: Διπλός κρίκος D; Μαγνητικό κούμπωμα; Μικρομετρική καστάνια; Αγκράφα γρήγορης απασφάλισης; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tipul sistemului de închidere și fixare al căștii: Inel dublu în formă de D; Închidere magnetică; Cataramă micrometrică; Cataramă cu eliberare rapidă; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta zapenjanja sistema za pritrditev čelade: Dvojni D-obroček; Magnetno zapenjanje; Mikrometrična zaponka; Hitro zapenjalna zaponka; Drugo
ja: ヘルメット維持閉鎖タイプ: ダブルDリング; マグネット式クロージャー; マイクロメトリックラチェット; クイックリリースバックル; その他
vi: Loại khóa giữ mũ bảo hiểm: Khóa chữ D kép; Khóa từ tính; Khóa bánh cóc; Khóa nhả nhanh; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta sustava za pričvršćivanje kacige: Dvostruki D-prsten; Magnetsko zatvaranje; Mikrometrijska kopča; Kopča za brzo otpuštanje; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de fechamento de retenção do capacete: Anel duplo D; Fecho magnético; Catraca micrométrica; Fivela de liberação rápida; Outro
da: Type af hageremslukning på hjelm: Dobbelt D-ring; Magnetisk lukning; Mikrometrisk skralde; Quick-release-spænde; Andet
sk-SK: Typ zapínania prilby: Dvojitý D-krúžok; Magnetické zapínanie; Mikrometrická pracka; Rýchloupínacia pracka; Iné
zh-CN: 头盔固定闭合类型: 双 D 环; 磁扣; 微调棘轮扣; 快拆带扣; 其他
hu: A sisak rögzítőzárának típusa: Dupla D-gyűrű; Mágneses zár; Mikrometrikus racsni; Gyorskioldós csat; Egyéb
sv: Stängningstyp för hjälmens hakrem: Dubbel D-ring; Magnetstängning; Mikrometriskt spänne; Snabbspänne; Övrigt
en: Helmet retention closure type: Double D-ring; Magnetic closure; Micrometric ratchet; Quick-release buckle; Other
cs: Typ zapínání/uzavírání helmy: Dvojitý D-kroužek; Magnetické zapínání; Mikrometrická ráčna; Rychloupínací spona; Jiné
th: ประเภทตัวล็อกยึดหมวกกันน็อค: Double D-ring; ตัวล็อกแบบแม่เหล็ก; ตัวล็อกแบบกิ๊บล็อก; หัวเข็มขัดแบบปลดเร็ว; อื่นๆ
nb: Hjelmbevaring lukkingstype: Dobbel D-ring; Magnetisk lukking; Mikrometrisk spenne; Hurtigspenne; Annet
bg-BG: Тип на системата за закопчаване и фиксиране на каската: Двоен D-образен пръстен; Магнитно закопчаване; Микрометрична катарама; Катарама за бързо освобождаване; Други
de: Typ des Helmverschlusses: Doppel-D-Ring; Magnetverschluss; Mikrometrischer Ratschenverschluss; Schnellverschluss-Schnalle; Sonstige
ko: 헬멧 유지 폐쇄형: 더블 D 링; 자석 클로저; 마이크로메트릭 래칫; 퀵 릴리스 버클; 기타
lt-LT: Šalmo užsegimo tipas: Dvigubo D formos žiedo; Magnetinis užsegimas; Mikrometrinis terkšlinis užsegimas; Greitojo atleidimo sagtis; Kita
ru: Тип застежки системы фиксации шлема: Двойное D-образное кольцо; Магнитная застежка; Микрометрическая трещотка; Быстросъемная застежка; Другое
zh-TW: 頭盔固定扣合類型: 雙 D 扣; 磁扣; 齒排扣; 快拆扣; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de fecho do capacete de retenção de clientes: Duplo anel em D; Fecho magnético; Fecho micrométrico; Fivela de desengate rápido; Outro